New Jersey, session 222, S4132.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 24 of P.L.1994, c.182 (C.39:2-3.2) is amended to read as follows: 24.  a. The Secretary of State, with the assistance of the Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission, shall provide for an eligible applicant to simultaneously apply for a motor vehicle driver's license, an examination permit, a probationary driver's license, or a non-driver identification card, as applicable, and be automatically registered to vote, or have an existing voter registration updated, in a manner which satisfies both the requirements necessary to receive a license to operate a motor vehicle, pursuant to R.S.39:3-10, or an examination permit, a probationary driver's license, or a non-driver identification card, as applicable, and to register to vote, pursuant to R.S.19:4-1.  The applicant shall be offered an opportunity to decline the automatic voter registration under this section. b. (1) Pursuant to subsection a. of this section, for every application for a REAL ID license or identification card, and each related update, renewal, or change of address, where, in the course of business with the Motor Vehicle Commission, the applicant provides or has provided documentation demonstrating United States citizenship, is determined to not already be registered to vote in the State of New Jersey in accordance with subsection g. of this section, and is of sufficient age to register to vote, the Chief Administrator shall promptly transmit electronically to the Secretary of State the applicants: (a) name; (b) date of birth; (c) drivers license or state ID number; (d) residence address, and mailing address if different from the residence address; (e) county of residence; (f) information concerning the applicants citizenship status; (g) signature as a digitized image; (h) telephone number, if available; and (i) e-mail address, if available. The Chief Administrator shall not transmit information for any person who, at the time of an application for a REAL ID license or identification card or a related update, renewal, or change of address transaction for a REAL ID license or identification card with the Motor Vehicle Commission, provides a document that conclusively demonstrates that the person is not a United States citizen.  Nothing in this section shall be construed to amend the substantive qualifications for voter registration in this State, or to require documentary proof of citizenship for voter registration, or to require the Motor Vehicle Commission to maintain or validate official records of voter registration.  Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the Motor Vehicle Commission to request documentation establishing an applicants citizenship solely for the purposes of voter registration. (2) Upon receiving information pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection for a person who is not registered to vote in the State of New Jersey, is of sufficient age to register to vote, and has provided documentation demonstrating United States citizenship in the course of business with the Motor Vehicle Commission, unless the Secretary of State determines that the person is ineligible to register to vote or is a member of the Address Confidentiality Program pursuant to R.S.47:4-1, the Secretary of State shall transmit the persons information to the appropriate county commissioner of registration. (3) Upon receiving information pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection, a county commissioner of registration shall proceed to register the person to vote pursuant to section 17 of P.L.1974, c.30 (C.19:31-6.5) and send to the persons address of record, by nonforwardable mail, a notice that the person has been registered to vote that contains a postage paid preaddressed return form by which the person may affiliate with a political party or decline to be registered and request that their registration be removed from the Statewide voter registration system. Such notice shall also provide an option for the person to apply for and receive a mail-in ballot as provided under section 3 of P.L.2009, c.79 (C.19:63-3), until the voter requests otherwise.  A notice mailed pursuant to this paragraph shall include an explanation of the eligibility requirements to register to vote.  The notice shall also state the penalties for submission of a false application.  A person shall not be registered to vote pursuant to this subsection until their information has been received and processed by a county commissioner of registration pursuant to section 17 of P.L.1974, c.30 (C.19:31-6.5), provided that such registration shall be deemed effective as of the date of the persons application with the Motor Vehicle Commission. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to alter the provisions of R.S.19:31-15. (4) The notice provided under paragraph (3) of this subsection shall also include a statement that, if the person declines to register to vote and requests to have their registration removed from the Statewide voter registration system, the request will remain confidential unless required by other laws, regulations, or a lawful court order or subpoena, and will be used only for election administration purposes under the provisions of Title 19 of the Revised Statutes.  Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to alter the provisions of R.S.19:31-15.  The notice shall also include a statement that, if a person does not decline registration, the office at which the person was registered will remain confidential and will be used only for election administration purposes. (5) The Secretary of State shall prescribe the form of the notice required under paragraph (3) of this subsection.  Such notice may be combined with the notice provided to newly registered voters pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection a. of section 17 of P.L.1974, c.30 (C:19:31-6.5).  The notice shall include the required information in English and Spanish, as well any additional language which is the primary language of five percent or more of the registered voters in the county where the notice is mailed. (6) If a person returns the notice provided under paragraph (3) of this subsection by declining to be registered and requesting to have their registration removed from the Statewide voter registration system, the county commissioner of registration shall remove the persons voter registration from the Statewide voter registration system, and the person shall be deemed to have never registered.  However, if the person has voted in an election after the transfer of the persons record but before the notice is returned, the returned form shall be of no force and effect and the person shall be registered as of the date of the persons application with the Motor Vehicle Commission.  Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to alter the provisions of R.S.19:31-15. (7) If a person returns the notice provided under paragraph (3) of this subsection and affiliates with a political party, the person shall be registered to vote as of the date of the persons application with the Motor Vehicle Commission and the persons affiliation shall be marked effective as of the date the affiliation information is received. (8) If the person returns the notice provided under paragraph (3) of this subsection but does not select any options or provide any new information, the form shall be of no force and effect, and the person shall remain registered to vote. (9) If a notice provided under paragraph (3) of this subsection is returned as undeliverable, the county commissioner of registration shall send the person a confirmation notice pursuant to subsection d. of R.S.19:31-15. (10) Information relating to the return of a notice form declining to be registered shall not be used for any purpose other than as described under paragraph (4) of this subsection. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit, or in any way restrict, any action where such prohibition or restriction would be contrary to federal law.  However, documents, records, or information relating to an individual persons decision declining to be registered shall not be disclosed for any purpose related to Title 8 of the United States Code without the persons informed consent, a warrant signed by a State or federal judge, or a lawful court order or subpoena. c.     (1) Pursuant to subsection a. of this section, for every application for a standard motor vehicle driver's license, an examination permit, a standard probationary driver's license, or a standard non-driver identification card, and each related update, renewal, or change of address, by a person who is determined to not already be registered to vote in the State of New Jersey in accordance with subsection g. of this section, except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, the Chief Administrator shall ensure that the information necessary for voter registration is collected from the application and promptly transmitted electronically to the Secretary of State if the applicant selects the option to register to vote. Such application shall require an applicant to either affirmatively select or affirmatively decline voter registration as a necessary condition to complete the application.  The Chief Administrator shall ensure that electronic records are not transmitted to the Secretary of State for any applicant who has declined registration under this subsection.  Upon receiving information pursuant to this section, the Secretary of State shall transmit the persons information to the appropriate county commissioner of registration. The Commissioner of Registration shall register to vote any eligible applicant who has selected voter registration under this subsection. (2) Voter registration information from an application received online for the renewal of a motor vehicle driver's license or non-driver identification card shall be collected and promptly transmitted electronically to the Secretary of State upon the implementation by the Secretary of State of online voter registration.  Subsection c. of this section shall be inapplicable to such applications until that time. (3) Voter registration information from an application received through the mail for the renewal of a motor vehicle driver's license or non-driver identification card shall be exempt from collection and electronic transmission to the Secretary of State until such time as the Chief Administrator determines that the prompt electronic transmission of the information is practicable.  Paragraph 4 of this section shall be inapplicable to such applications until that time.  Following the effective date of P.L.2018, c.6, the Chief Administrator shall inform the Governor and the Legislature every six months of the practicability of collecting and transmitting to the Secretary of State voter registration information from such applications.  This paragraph shall not be construed to preclude the Motor Vehicle Commission from processing voter registration applications received in the manner in which such applications were processed in connection with such renewals prior to the effective date of P.L.2018, c.6. (4) The Chief Administrator shall provide for the following notices to be provided with every application for a standard motor vehicle drivers license, an examination permit, a standard probationary driver's license, or a standard non-driver identification card and every related update, renewal, or change of address conducted pursuant to subsection c. of this section: (a) a notice requiring the applicant to either affirmatively select or affirmatively decline voter registration as a necessary condition to complete the application; (b) a notice of the voter eligibility requirements under R.S.19:4-1 and the penalties for false registration and illegal voting under Title 19 of the Revised Statutes, which notice shall contain an affirmation that the applicant meets each such requirement and shall require the signature of the applicant, under penalty of law; and (c) a notice that an applicant who is a victim of domestic violence or stalking may decline the automatic voter registration and register to vote without disclosing the applicant's street address pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1994, c.148 (C.19:31-3.2). d.    (1) For every application for a motor vehicle drivers license, an examination permit, a probationary drivers license, or a non-driver identification card, and each related update, renewal, or change of address, by an applicant who is determined to already be registered to vote in the State of New Jersey pursuant to subsection g. of this section, the Chief Administrator shall promptly transmit electronically to the Secretary of State information regarding the applicants name and address for the purpose of maintaining current information on the applicant. (2) Any change of address notification received by the Chief Administrator in paper format shall be reported to the Secretary of State no later than the 10th day following its receipt by the Chief Administrator. (3)   For any information received from the Chief Administrator pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection d. of this section for an applicant who is already registered to vote in the State of New Jersey, and that indicates a different name or address from that on the persons voter registration record, the Secretary of State shall transmit change of address and change of name information for the person to the appropriate commissioner of registration.  The Commissioner of Registration in the applicants county of residence shall use the change of address or change of name notification to update an existing voter registration, transfer the persons registration file if inactive to the active file, and send to the persons address of record, by forwardable mail, notice of the change and a postage paid preaddressed return form by which the person may verify or correct the information.  If the person returns the notice and indicates that the change to the persons registration record was an error, the appropriate county commissioners of registration, including the commissioner of the previous county of residence, shall immediately correct the persons previously updated information in the Statewide Voter Registration System.  A change of address notification submitted to the commission, which is used for voter registration purposes, shall be subject to the provisions of section 1 of P.L.1994, c.148 (C.19:31-3.2) if the person submitting the change of address notification previously registered to vote in accordance with that section. e.  If a person who is not entitled to vote becomes registered to vote pursuant to this section, that person's registration shall be presumed to have been effected with official authorization, and the person shall not be deemed to have committed a crime under R.S.19:34-1.  This subsection shall not apply to a person who knowingly and willfully makes a false statement to effectuate voter registration. f.     The Secretary of State, with the assistance of the Chief Administrator, shall take appropriate measures to educate the public about voter registration under this section. g.    The Secretary of State and the Chief Administrator shall jointly develop a process by which the Motor Vehicle Commission, upon obtaining a persons full name, date of birth, drivers license or state identification number, residence address, and mailing address if different from residence address, may use information from the statewide voter registration system to determine whether the person is already registered to vote in the state. For the purposes of this section, "eligible applicant" means a person submitting to the commission an application for a motor vehicle driver's license, an examination permit, a probationary driver's license, or a non-driver identification card who meets all requirements for eligibility to vote under R.S.19:4-1. h.    If a person completing a transaction at a Motor Vehicle Commission agency location presents identification that indicates the person is not a citizen of the United States, the person shall not be prompted to register to vote on the electronic signature pad and the persons information shall not be transmitted by the Chief Administrator to the Secretary of State. (cf: P.L.2025, c.204, s.6) 2.    This act shall take effect 30 days after the date of enactment.